da: Kortstil: Antik reproduktion; Himmel; Konstellation; Historisk; Havbund; Fysisk; Politik; Relief; Satellitbilleder; Tematisk; Topografisk; Andet
ro-RO: Stilul hărții: Reproducere antică; Ceresc; Constelație; Istorică; Fundul oceanului; Fizică; Politică; Relief; Imagini din satelit; Tematică; Topografică; Altele
zh-TW: 地圖風格: 古董複製品; 天體圖; 星座; 歷史; 海底; 實體; 政治; 凸版; 衛星影像; 主題; 地形圖; 其他
bg-BG: Стил на картата: Антична репродукция; Небесено; Съзвездие; Исторически; Океанско дъно; Физическа; Политическа; Релефно; Сателитни изображения; Тематично; Топографско; Друго
ko: 지도 스타일: 앤틱 리프로덕션; 천체; 별자리; 역사; 해저; 물리적; 정치; 입체; 위성 이미지; 주제도; 지형; 기타
sk-SK: Štýl mapy: Starožitná reprodukcia; Hviezdna obloha; Konštelácia; Historická; Oceánske dno; Fyzická; Politická; Reliéfne; Satelitné snímky; Tematické; Topografické; Iné
pl: Typ mapy: Reprodukcja antyczna; Niebiański; Gwiazdozbiór; Historyczne; Dno oceanu; Fizyczne; Polityczne; Reliefowy; Zdjęcia satelitarne; Tematyczny; Topograficzny; Pozostałe
ja: 地図のスタイル: アンティーク複製; 天体; 星座; 歴史地図; 海底; 地勢図; 行政図; レリーフ; 衛星画像; テーマ別; 地形; その他
fr: Style cartographique: Reproduction d’antiquités; Céleste; Constellations; Historique; Fond océanique; Physique; Politique; Relief; Imagerie satellite; Thématique; Topographique; Autre
hr-HR: Stil karte: Antička reprodukcija; Nebo; Konstelacija; Povijesna; Oceansko dno; Fizička; Politika; Reljef; Satelitske snimke; Tematska; Topografska; Ostalo
sl-SI: Slog zemljevida: Antična reprodukcija; Nebesni; Ozvezdje; Zgodovina; Oceansko dno; Fizična; Politika; Olajšanje; Satelitski posnetki; Tematsko; Topografski; Druga
hu: Térkép stílusa: Antik reprodukció; Csillag; Csillagkép; Történelmi; Óceánfenék; Fizikai; Politikai; Domborzati; Műholdképek; Tematikus; Topográfiai; Egyéb
tr: Harita stili: Antika reprodüksiyonu; Göksel; Takımyıldız; Tarihi; Okyanus tabanı; Fiziksel; Siyasi; Rölyef; Uydu görüntüsü; Tematik; Topografik; Diğer
el: Στυλ χάρτη: Αντίκα αναπαραγωγή; Ουράνιος; Αστερισμός; Ιστορικός; Βυθός του ωκεανού; Φυσικός; Πολιτικός; Ανακούφιση; Δορυφορικές εικόνες; Θεματικό; Τοπογραφικό; Άλλο
nl: Kaartstijl: Antieke reproductie; Hemel; Sterrenbeeld; Historisch; Oceaanbodem; Fysiek; Politiek; Reliëf; Satellietbeelden; Thematisch; Topografisch; Overig
cs: Styl mapy: Reprodukce starožitné mapy; Hvězdná obloha; Souhvězdné; Historické; Dno oceánu; Topografické; Politické; Reliéf; Satelitní snímky; Tematická; Topografická; Jiné
en: Map style: Antique reproduction; Celestial; Constellation; Historical; Ocean floor; Physical; Political; Relief; Satellite imagery; Thematic; Topographic; Other
lt-LT: Žemėlapio stilius: Antikvarinė reprodukcija; Dangaus; Žvaigždynų; Istoriniai; Vandenyno dugnas; Fizinis; Politinis; Reljefas; Palydoviniai vaizdai; Teminis; Topografinis; Kita
fi: Karttatyyli: Antiikkijäljitelmä; Tähtitieteellinen; Tähdistö; Historiallinen; Merenpohja; Luonnonmaantieteellinen; Poliittinen; Korkeuserot; Satelliittikuvat; Temaattinen; Topografinen; Muu
sv: Kartstil: Antik reproduktion; Himmelsk; Konstellation; Historiskt; Havsbotten; Fysiskt; Politisk; Lättnad; Satellitbilder; Tematisk; Topografisk; Övrigt
th: รูปแบบแผนที่: แผนที่จำลองแบบโบราณ; แผนที่ดาราศาสตร์; กลุ่มดาว; แบบอิงประวัติศาสตร์; แผนที่ภูมิประเทศใต้ทะเล; กายภาพ; การเมือง; แผนที่ภูมิประเทศแบบแสดงความสูงต่ำ; แผนที่จากภาพถ่ายดาวเทียม; แผนที่เฉพาะเรื่อง; แผนที่ภูมิประเทศ (แบบเส้นชั้นความสูง); อื่นๆ
nb: Kartstil: Antikk reproduksjon; Himmelsk; Konstellasjon; Historisk; Havbunn; Fysisk; Politisk; Relieff; Satellittbilder; Tematisk; Topografisk; Annet
vi: Kiểu bản đồ: Bản sao đồ cổ; Thiên thể; Chòm sao; Lịch sử; Đáy đại dương; Vật lý; Thuộc về chính trị; Bản đồ địa hình; Hình ảnh vệ tinh; Bản đồ chuyên đề; Bản đồ địa hình; Khác
ru: Стиль карты: Старинная репродукция; Небесный; Звездное небо; Историческая; Дно океана; Физическая; Политическая; Рельеф; Спутниковые снимки; Тематический; Топографический; Другая
es: Estilo de mapa: Reproducción antigua; Celestial; Constelación; Histórico; Fondo del océano; Físico; Político; Alivio; Imágenes de satélite; Temático; Topográfico; Otros
it: Stile della mappa: Riproduzione antica; Celeste; Costellazioni; Storico; Fondale oceanico; Fisico; Politico; Rilievi; Immagini satellitari; Tematico; Topografico; Altro
de: Kartenstil: Antike Reproduktion; Himmelskarte; Sternenbild; Historisch; Meeresboden; Physisch; Politisch; Relief; Satellitenbilder; Thematisch; Topografisch; Sonstiges
pt-PT: Estilo de mapa: Reprodução de antiguidade; Celestial; Constelação; Histórico; Fundo do oceano; Físico; Político; Relevo; Imagens de satélite; Temático; Topográfico; Outro
zh-CN: 地图样式: 古董复刻; 天文; 星座; 历史; 海底; 地形; 政治; 地势; 卫星图像; 专题; 地形; 其他
pt-BR: Estilo de mapa: Reprodução de antiguidade; Celestial; Constelação; Histórico; Fundo oceânico; Físico; Político; Relevo; Imagens de satélite; Temático; Topográfico; Outro